Virginia statutes. Title 44. Military and Emergency Laws.
Chapter 1.
Military Laws of Virginia.

Article 4.1.

National Guard Mutual Assistance Compact.

44-54.1.Compact enacted into law; terms.

44-54.2.Payment of liability of State pursuant to Article III (f) of compact.

44-54.3.Members of National Guard deemed to be in state service when engaged pursuant to compact.

Article 7.

Regulations as to Active Service.

44-75.1:1.Compact enacted into law; terms.